tutorial-env/lib/python3.6/site-packages/pyphen/dictionaries/hyph_ru.dic
лф2т
ль2тот
люк1в
м1г
м1ж
м1з
м1к
м1на
м1нее.
м1ней.
м1ное
м1нос
м1с
м1ф
м1ц
м2м1н
м2мк
м2с1ор
м2сти
м5неп
м5ний
м5нов
м5нот
м5х
м5э
м6ат
м6ль
ма1сб
ма2вз
ма2с1л
ма2т1р
ма2у
ма6чт
маг1н
мад1ри
ман2д1арм
мат1в
ме2д1осм
ме2о
ме2с1к
ме2ч1т
межо2т1
мете2о
мз6д
ми2ок
ми6з5ан
миро3з2
много1
мо1м
мо1п
мо1ско
мо2ж3ж
мо2т3р
мо3о
моз2г1л
моск1в
мосо2м3н
мп2л
мпо2ч
мс2н
му1г
му5с6к
мы4с3л
н1б
н1в2
н1г
н1д
н1ж
н1з
н1к
н1л
н1м
н1н
н1п
н1т
н1ф
н1х
н1ч
н1щ
н2дв
н2дг
н2дл
н2дн
н2с1ля
н2с1м
н2сн
н2сф
н2тк
н2тл
н2тр1а2г
н2трок
н2тш
н2шн
н6дц
на1з2
на1кв
на1м2ного
на1мн
на1рв
на1х
на1шл
на1шп
на3ивн
на3из
на3ит
на5э
наи1с2к
нао2т
нау6ч
нгоу5
нд2сп
нд6з
нде2с1
не1в2д
не1гл
не1гн
не1др
не1зн
не1мн
не1п2
не1с2н
не1с2п
не1ст
не1сч
не1т2р
не2а3по
не2вра
не2рот
не3о2гр
не3о2дин
не3о6с
не5кст
не5рж
не5с6х
нев2п
недо1с
нее6
неи2
нео2п
нео2пр
нео2р
нео2х
нео2ц
нес2к
нет2л
неу5стр
нея6
ни1п
ни1стр
ни5кт
нила6
нк5ро
нко1п
но1з
но1п
но1тв
но2пт
но5е
но5о
но5ш
ном5н
ноп2л
нсу2р
нт2р
нтиа2
нтио2
ну1ск
ну1т2р
о1бе
о1би
о1бо
о1бу
о1бы
о1бье
о1бьи
о1бью
о1бья
о1в2в
о1в2се
о1в2т
о1ва
о1ве
о1ви
о1вм
о1во
о1ву
о1вы
о1вье
о1вьи
о1вью
о1вья
о1вя
о1га
о1ге
о1ги
о1го
о1гу
о1да
о1де
о1ди
о1до
о1дру
о1ду
о1ды
о1дью
о1дю
о1дя
о1е
о1жа
о1же
о1жже
о1жи
о1жм
о1жо
о1жу
о1жье
о1жьи
о1жью
о1жья
о1зе
о1зи
о1зо
о1зу
о1зы
о1зье
о1зьи
о1зью
о1зья
о1зя
о1ка
о1кв
о1ке
о1ки
о1ко
о1ку
о1ла
о1ле
о1ли
о1лу
о1лы
о1лье
о1льи
о1лья
о1лю
о1ля
о1ма
о1ме
о1ми
о1мо
о1му
о1мч
о1мы
о1мье
о1мья
о1мя
о1на
о1не
о1ни
о1но
о1ну
о1ны
о1нье
о1ньи
о1нью
о1нья
о1ню
о1ня
о1о2
о1па
о1пе
о1пи
о1по
о1пу
о1пы
о1пье
о1пьи
о1пью
о1пья
о1пя
о1ра
о1рват
о1ре
о1ри
о1ро
о1ру
о1рье
о1рью
о1рья
о1рю
о1ря
о1с2кла
о1с2пор
о1с2то
о1с2шив
о1са
о1сб
о1се
о1си
о1сне
о1сним
о1спе
о1ста
о1сте
о1сти
о1стр
о1сту
о1сты
о1стье
о1стьи
о1стью
о1стья
о1стю
о1стя
о1су
о1сче
о1сы
о1сье
о1сьи
о1сью
о1сья
о1сю
о1та
о1то
о1ту
о1ты
о1тье
о1тьи
о1тью
о1тья
о1тя
о1фа
о1фе
о1фи
о1фо
о1фу
о1фье
о1фьи
о1фью
о1фья
о1ха
о1хе
о1хо
о1ху
о1ца
о1це
о1ци
о1че
о1чи
о1чл
о1чу
о1чье
о1чьи
о1чью
о1чья
о1ш2л
о1ша
о1ше
о1ши
о1шо
о1шу
о1шье
о1шью
о1ща
о1ще
о1щи
о1щу
о1щью
о1ю
о1я
о2б1раж
о2б1раз
о2в1па
о2вры
о2д1о2бол
о2д1о2дея
о2д3раж
о2дотр
о2евр
о2з1вол
о2з1но
о2з1ну
о2з1об
о2зня
о2зым
о2зьт
о2к1а2у
о2нн
о2ф1ак
о2ф1ра
о2ш3лы
о3в2люб
о3ло
о3отр
о3с2бер
о3ти
о5двиг
о5ом
о5пте
о5ру.
о5спу
о5ть6м
о5х6т
о5ча
о6тва
о6шн
об1в
об1о2с3н
об1ращ
об2луди
об5лик
об5лич
об5рад
об5рам
ово5стр
овыс2п
од1ра
од1рос
од1э
од2лит
оди5ап
одо1с
одс2п
одь1яч
ое2д
ое2с
оз1до
оз1ро
оз2дор
оз5дю
озо2б1л
ои2г6
ои2з
ои2ме
ои2му
ои6о
ок1з
ок1ну
ок5не
олу3д4
олуо2
оль1д
ом1ного
ом1р
ом2ня
он2трат
он6тру
онс2
оп1та
оп1ти
ор1исп
ор2б1л
ор5ть
ор5тя
орас6пр
ос1ка.
ос1кам
ос1ках
ос1ке
ос1ки
ос1кой
ос1ку.
ос1мет
ос1мос
ос1пы
ос2н
ос2с1м
ос2св
ос3ного
ос3ною
ос5ба
ос5ми
ос5нит
ос6пле
от1в
от1л
от1раз
от1у2ж
от1у2т
от1у2ч
от2лев
ото1д2ра
ото2чь
оту2а
оту2че
офо2р
ох1рис
оэ5ти
оя2в
оя2д
оя2з
оя6р
п1д
п1ла.
п1лен
п1лютс
п1ля
п1ск
п1тр
п1туа
п1ты
п1тя
п1щ
п2леде
п2ляс
п2ляш
п3леть.
п5лова
п5тил
п6е
па1с2к
па2в
па2с1то
па2ск1в
па5во
па5др
пав1л
пах1л
пе2п1л
пе2тл
пе6с5к
пеп1т
пер1в
пер2м1ал
пере3о6с
пи2ск
пи5с2коп
пле2в1р
по1д2раг
по1з
по1мн
по1п
по1ск
по1см
по1сх
по1х
по2д1ж
по2д1о2к
по2д1о2си
по2д1руб
по2д1рул
по2д1рум
по2д1руч
по2д1у2ро
по2дь
по3вли
по5б
по5сс
пог6
пое2
поз2л
пос2
поэ1м
ппо1д
пре2до2т
пре2дох
прей2с1к
при1в2н
при1вк
при1л
при1с
при1т
при2тч
приль2
прис2п
приче2с1к
про1д2л
про1д2ра
про1р
про1ск
пт1в
пу2б1л
пуг1л
пуг3н
пх6н
р1б
р1ва.
р1вар
р1вац
р1веж
р1вей
р1вен
р1ви
р1во
р1г
р1д
р1ж
р1за
р1зе
р1зи
р1зо
р1зя
р1к
р1л
р1м
р1н
р1п
р1р
р1с
р1та
р1те
р1ти
р1то
р1тр
р1ту
р1ты
р1тью
р1тю
р1ф
р1ха
р1хе
р1хло
р1хов
р1хуш
р1ц
р1ч
р1ш
р1щ
р2г1л
р2г1н
р2гв
р2гг
р2гот
р2д1ц
р2дл
р2дн
р2дч
р2жн
р2ль
р2м1н
р2м5ч
р2мк
р2мс
р2мф
р2сн
р2т1акт
р2т1л
р2т1об
р2узл
р2хв
р2ш1р
р2шк
р2шн
р2щ3в2
р5вя
р5хот
р6дв
р6мщ
р6хре
ра2зобл
ра2п1л
ра2с1та
ра2с1тер
ра2с1то
ра2с1ту
ра2с1тя
ра2так
ра3зорен
ра3зори
ра5ун
ра5ус
ра6сля
ра6стуш
раа6
раз1в
рас1пы
рас1т2л
рас1тра
рас1трог
рас3тян
расто2пл
рат1в
рах1л
раэ2
ре1г2н
ре1зр
ре1р2
ре1с2п
ре1сч
ре1т2р
ре2д1о2бе
ре2д1о2пе
ре2д1о2се
ре2д1у2г
ре2д3о2ли
ре2допр
ре2дос
ре2к1ват
ре2ос
ре2х1р
рег1ли
ред1р
рее2
рей2х
рем1н
рео2д
рео2ц
реп5ло
ри1дв
ри1жм
ри1зв
ри1мч
рис2м
риу2
рк1н
рк6ни
ро1дв
ро1зв
ро1зр
ро1пл
ро1с2кл
ро1см
ро1х
ро2г1не
ро2г1ну
ро2с1л
ро2х1н
ро5бр
ро5спа
ро5спл
ро5шт
рое6х
рои2с
рооп1р
рор2в
рпус1к
рро1
ррос6
рс6п
рт1в
рт1лю
руг1в
руг1л
руг1н
рх1оп
ры2г1н
рыт1в
рых1
рю5ква
рю5кве
с1вен
с1да
с1до
с1н
с1па
с1пил
с1пит
с1пл
с1с
с1хо
с1ц
с1чат
с1чл
с1ш6
с1щ
с2воя
с2гор
с2добн
с2катн
с2клер
с2пеш
с2раб
с2рез
с2сб
с2сн
с2сори
с2тяну
с2цена
с3с2не
с5ге
с5ди
с5на.
с5ное
с5ной
с5ном
с6как
са2б1л
само1
сва6е
свах2
све2т
све2т1л
свер2хи
сверх1
сг6
се1гн
се1з
сего1
сегод2
секс1т
сер1ве
сер5ва
си2п1л
си3ом
ск1ну
ск2вер
ско2б1л
смо2г1л
сму2г1
со1бр
со1д2ра
со1ж
со1з
со1л2г
со1м2
со1р2в
со1с2
со1тв
со2в1м
со2сь
со2тле
со3з2да
со5вл
со5о
со5щ
со6с5н
сп2люсь.
сс1во
ст1ли
ст5вер
ств2л
сто1пл
су1гл
су2б
су2ев
су2ни
суб1а
суб1л
супе2р1
сче2с1к
съ2е3ма
съе3д
съе3л
съе3мо
съе3х
сы2п3ле
сып1лю
т1вой
т1вою
т1д2
т1ж
т1з
т1к
т1лог
т1рез
т1рыв
т1ха
т1хо
т1ч
т1ш2
т2вл
т2рав
т2сд
т4рщ
та1ст
таме2н
тво1з
те1ст
те2к1л
те2ос
те2п1л
те2р1ак
те6хо
тег1н
тек1ста
теле3о
тем5н
тер1в
тере2о
тет1р2а
ти1стр
ти2в1л
ти2г1л
ти5а
ти5ок
тк2но
то1бр
то1д
то1з
то1с2
то2дн
то2ж1д
тооп1
трдо2
тре2х
тс2к
тс2н
ту2пр
туп1л
тыс5к
ть6му
у1а
у1ба
у1бе
у1би
у1бо
у1бу
у1бы
у1бье
у1бью
у1бья
у1бю
у1бя
у1ва
у1ве
у1ви
у1во
у1ву
у1вы
у1вье
у1вью
у1вя
у1га
у1ге
у1ги
у1го
у1гу
у1да
у1де
у1ди
у1до
у1ду
у1ды
у1дьи
у1дью
у1дю
у1дя
у1е
у1жа
у1же
у1жи
у1жо
у1жу
у1жье
у1жьи
у1жью
у1жья
у1за
у1зе
у1зи
у1зо
у1зу
у1зы
у1зья
у1зя
у1и
у1ка
у1ке
у1ки
у1ко
у1ку
у1кья
у1ла
у1ли
у1ло
у1лу
у1лы
у1лье
у1льи
у1лья
у1лю
у1ля
у1ма
у1ме
у1ми
у1мо
у1му
у1мы
у1мье
у1мью
у1мья
у1мя
у1на
у1не
у1ни
у1но
у1ну
у1ны
у1нье
у1ньи
у1нью
у1нья
у1ню
у1ня
у1о
у1па
у1пе
у1пи
у1по
у1пу
у1пы
у1пье
у1пью
у1пья
у1пю
у1пя
у1ра
у1ре
у1ри
у1ро
у1ру
у1ры
у1рье
у1рьи
у1рью
у1рья
у1рю
у1ря
у1са
у1се
у1си
у1см
у1со
у1ста
у1сте
у1сти
у1сту
у1сты
у1стье
у1стью
у1стья
у1стя
у1су
у1сф
у1сы
у1сье
у1сью
у1сья
у1сю
у1та
у1те
у1ти
у1тл
у1то
у1ту
у1ты
у1тье
у1тью
у1тья
у1тю
у1тя
у1у
у1фа
у1фе
у1фи
у1фо
у1фу
у1фье
у1фьи
у1фью
у1фья
у1ха
у1хе
у1хи
у1хо
у1ху
у1ца
у1це
у1ци
у1цу
у1ча
у1че
у1чи
у1чу
у1чье
у1чьи
у1чью
у1чья
у1ша
у1ше
у1ши
у1шо
у1шу
у1шье
у1шьи
у1шью
у1шья
у1ща
у1ще
у1щи
у1що
у1щу
у1ю
у1я
у2б1р
у2д1р
у2ес
у2х1р
у2хв
у2ш1лы
у4ныв
у5ле
у5мр
у5ол
у5шл
у5э
у6але
у6ас
у6зел
у6трь
уд2в
уд2рс
уе1р
уе2ди
уз5дю
ук1в
ук5н
укос6
уль1д
ум1ног
уо2к
ур1в
ус1ка
ус1ке
ус1ки
ус1ком
ус1ч
ус2кр
ус2по
ус5ков
ус5ку.
ут5ла
уть6м
уу2с
ух1л
ух1м
ух1о2к
уш3п
уэ5ла
уэ5ле
уя2з
ф1б
ф1г
ф1к
ф1м
ф1т
ф1ф
ф1ш
ф2узл
фа5у
фаг1н
фар5в
фе1д
фе2д1р
фе2с1к
фени6
фи1д
фи1с2к
фи2дн
фи3о
фи6нин
фото1
фра5с
фре2с1к
х1б
х1д6
х1з
х1к
х1ли
х1ло.
х1лу
х1лы
х1ля
х1ма
х1ми
х1н
х1осн
х1п
х1т
х1у2ро
х1ф6
х1х
х1ц
х1ш
х1э
х2лип
х2ляб
х4ны
х5ла.
х5мет
х5осм
хе6о5
хи2зы
хие2
хо1тв
хо2пе
хоз1ар
хри2п1л
хро2м1ч
ц1б
ц1д
ц1н
ц1р
ц1ц
ца2п1л
це1д
це2д1р
цей6т5
ци2к1л
ци2ф1р
ч1в
ч1н
ч1с
ч1ч
ч1ш
ча2т1л
чар3т
част1в
чет1вер
чех1л
чи2с1л
чу2ж1д
ш1к
ш1ля
ш1м
ш1н
ш1с
ш1ц
ш2кив
ш2лем
ш2лют.
ш2пр
ш5ч
ш6леш
шаг1н
ше1с
шео2
ши2в1л
ши2ф1р
ще1д
ще1с
ще2д1р
щи2п3л
ъ1я2
ъе2
ъе3х
ъем3н
ъю6с
ъю6т
ы1ба
ы1бе
ы1би
ы1бо
ы1бр
ы1бу
ы1бы
ы1бье
ы1бьи
ы1бью
ы1бья
ы1бя
ы1ва
ы1ве
ы1ви
ы1во
ы1ву
ы1вы
ы1вя
ы1г
ы1га
ы1ге
ы1ги
ы1го
ы1гу
ы1да
ы1дв
ы1де
ы1ди
ы1до
ы1ду
ы1ды
ы1дю
ы1дя
ы1е2
ы1жа
ы1же
ы1жж
ы1жи
ы1жм
ы1жо
ы1жр
ы1жу
ы1за
ы1зв
ы1зд
ы1зе
ы1зо
ы1зр
ы1зу
ы1зы
ы1зя
ы1и2
ы1ка
ы1ке
ы1ки
ы1ко
ы1ку
ы1ла
ы1ле
ы1ли
ы1ло
ы1лу
ы1лы
ы1лье
ы1льи
ы1лья
ы1лю
ы1ля
ы1ма
ы1ме
ы1ми
ы1мо
ы1му
ы1мы
ы1мя
ы1на
ы1не
ы1ни
ы1но
ы1ну
ы1ны
ы1нье
ы1ньи
ы1нью
ы1нья
ы1ню
ы1ня
ы1па
ы1пе
ы1пи
ы1по
ы1пу
ы1пы
ы1пье
ы1пью
ы1пя
ы1ра
ы1рв
ы1ре
ы1ри
ы1ро
ы1ру
ы1ры
ы1рье
ы1рью
ы1рья
ы1рю
ы1ря
ы1са
ы1се
ы1си
ы1со
ы1ст
ы1ста
ы1сте
ы1сти
ы1сту
ы1сты
ы1стью
ы1су
ы1сы
ы1сье
ы1сьи
ы1сью
ы1сья
ы1т6р
ы1та
ы1те
ы1ти
ы1то
ы1ту
ы1ты
ы1тье
ы1тьи
ы1тью
ы1тья
ы1тя
ы1у2
ы1ха
ы1хе
ы1хи
ы1хо
ы1ху
ы1ц
ы1ца
ы1це
ы1ча
ы1че
ы1чи
ы1чу
ы1чье
ы1чьи
ы1чью
ы1чья
ы1ша
ы1ше
ы1ши
ы1шо
ы1шу
ы1шью
ы1шья
ы1ща
ы1ще
ы1щи
ы1що
ы1щу
ы1я2
ы2з1вол
ы2с1ку
ы5см
ы6шн
ык1в
ык5н
ым1ч
ып1ле
ыре2х
ыс2мей
ыс5ки
ыс6па
ыс6пл
ыш1ле
ь1б
ь1ва
ь1ве
ь1ви
ь1г
ь1де
ь1ди
ь1ж
ь1з
ь1к
ь1м
ь1н
ь1п
ь1с
ь1т
ь1х
ь1ч
ь1ш
ь1щ
ь1э
ь2к1ло
ь2нул
ь2сн
ь2сти
ь2стя
ь2ф1ра
ь5дь
ь5дя
ь5фе
ь6зн
ь6зя.
ь6мс
ь6ща
ь6ще
ь6щу
ьдо1
ьк5н
ьти5с
ьхо2
э1ля
э1нь
э1о
э1я
э2д
э5зи
э5ка
э5ке
э5лы
э5ри
э5ш
э6в
э6ф
эд1р
эк1в
эк1з
эк1л
эк2ск
экс1
экс2и
эль5
эро1
эс1к
эс2па
эс5м
ю1а
ю1б
ю1ба
ю1бе
ю1би
ю1бо
ю1бу
ю1бы
ю1бя
ю1ва
ю1ве
ю1ви
ю1во
ю1ву
ю1вы
ю1га
ю1ге
ю1ги
ю1го
ю1гу
ю1да
ю1де
ю1ди
ю1до
ю1ду
ю1ды
ю1дью
ю1дя
ю1е
ю1жа
ю1же
ю1жи
ю1жо
ю1жу
ю1жье
ю1жьи
ю1жью
ю1жья
ю1за
ю1зе
ю1зи
ю1зо
ю1зу
ю1зы
ю1зю
ю1зя
ю1и
ю1ка
ю1ке
ю1ки
ю1ко
ю1ку
ю1ла
ю1ле
ю1ло
ю1лу
ю1лы
ю1лю
ю1ля
ю1ма
ю1ме
ю1ми
ю1мо
ю1му
ю1мы
ю1на
ю1не
ю1ни
ю1но
ю1ну
ю1ны
ю1ню
ю1ня
ю1о
ю1па
ю1пи
ю1по
ю1ра
ю1ре
ю1ри
ю1ро
ю1ру
ю1ры
ю1рю
ю1ря
ю1са
ю1се
ю1со
ю1ста
ю1сте
ю1сти
ю1стр
ю1сту
ю1сты
ю1стью
ю1стя
ю1су
ю1сы
ю1сю
ю1та
ю1те
ю1ти
ю1то
ю1ту
ю1ты
ю1тя
ю1фа
ю1фе
ю1фя
ю1ха
ю1хе
ю1хи
ю1хо
ю1ху
ю1це
ю1ци
ю1ша
ю1ше
ю1ши
ю1шо
ю1шу
ю1ща
ю1ще
ю1щи
ю1що
ю1щу
ю1ю
ю1я
ю2бч
ю2д1ж
ю2ли
ю2с1к
юй2д1
юйдо6
юк1з
юк1н
юм1н
юмини5
я1ба
я1бе
я1би
я1бо
я1бр
я1бу
я1бы
я1бью
я1бя
я1ва
я1ве
я1ви
я1во
я1ву
я1вы
я1вью
я1вя
я1га
я1ге
я1ги
я1го
я1гу
я1да
я1де
я1ди
я1до
я1ду
я1ды
я1дью
я1дю
я1дя
я1е
я1жа
я1же
я1жи
я1жо
я1жу
я1жье
я1жьи
я1жью
я1жья
я1за
я1зе
я1зи
я1зо
я1зу
я1зы
я1зью
я1зья
я1зю
я1зя
я1и
я1ка
я1ке
я1ки
я1ко
я1ку
я1ла
я1ле
я1ли
я1ло
я1лу
я1лы
я1лю
я1ля
я1ма
я1ме
я1ми
я1мо
я1му
я1мы
я1мя
я1на
я1не
я1ни
я1но
я1ну
я1ны
я1нье
я1ньи
я1нью
я1нья
я1ню
я1ня
я1па
я1пе
я1пи
я1по
я1пу
я1пы
я1пье
я1пью
я1пья
я1пя
я1ра
я1ре
я1ри
я1ро
я1ру
я1ры
я1рье
я1рью
я1рья
я1ря
я1са
я1се
я1си
я1со
я1ста
я1сти
я1сту
я1сты
я1стье
я1стью
я1стья
я1су
я1сы
я1та
я1те
я1то
я1ту
я1ты
я1тье
я1тью
я1тья
я1тю
я1тя
я1у
я1ха
я1хе
я1хи
я1хо
я1ху
я1ца
я1це
я1ци
я1цу
я1ча
я1че
я1чи
я1чу
я1чье
я1чьи
я1чью
я1чья
я1ша
я1ше
я1ши
я1шо
я1шу
я1ща
я1ще
я1щи
я1що
я1щу
я1ю
я1я
я2в1л
я5стр
я5ти
яг1л
яг5н
яз1в
як1н
яс1к
яс6т
ят1в
ях1ле
